Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1965
Other methods of electing directors.

A corporation may provide in its articles or bylaws for the election of directors by members or delegates (1) on the basis of chapter or other organizational unit, (2) by region or other geographic unit, (3) by preferential voting, or (4) by any other reasonable method.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 65.

Cumulative voting for directors, see Article XII, section 1, Constitution of Nebraska.